Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.420

Reimbursement for classes provided outside regular school year.

The superintendent of public instruction shall establish procedures to allow school districts to claim basic education allocation funds for students attending classes that are provided outside the regular school year to the extent such attendance is in lieu of attendance during the regular school year: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall be construed to alter the basic education allocation for which the district is otherwise eligible.

[ 1989 c 233 s 10. Formerly RCW 28A.41.172.]